District of Columbia statutes.
5-119.16

Property delivered to owner preceding trial — Large quantities of goods held for sale.

When large quantities of goods held for sale by the owner, come into the possession of the Property Clerk as the proceeds of crime, the same may be delivered to the owner, his heirs or representatives, as provided in § 5-119.06, upon ample security to prosecute the case. But in such cases goods to the estimated value of $50 shall be retained by the Property Clerk until the discharge or conviction of the accused.

History

R.S., D.C., § 422

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-119.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-167.
1973 Ed., § 4-165.